spanish-morph/spanish.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +A @P.FM.ON@ @D.FM@ @C.FM@

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;
Adj ;

LEXICON Ninf

+N:0 #;
+N:^s #;
+N:^a #;
+N:^as #;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0 #;

+V:^do #;
+V:^da #;
+V:^das #;
+V:^dos #;

+V:^ndo #;

+V:^ae #;
+V:^ea #;
+V:^d #;

+V:^o #;
+V:^s #;
+V:^mos #;
+V:^ís #;
+V:^n #;

+V:^í #;
+V:^ste #;
+V:^ó #;
+V:^imos #;
+V:^steis #;
+V:^ron #;

+V:^a #;
+V:^as #;
+V:^amos #;
+V:^ais #;
+V:^an #;

+V:^ré #;
+V:^ás #;
+V:^á #;
+V:^rremos #;
+V:^éis #;
+V:^án #;

+V:^eas #;
+V:^eamos #;
+V:^is #;
+V:^ean #;

+V:^re #;
+V:^res #;
+V:^remos #;
+V:^reis #;
+V:^ren #;

+V:^ra #;
+V:^ras #;
+V:^ramos #;
+V:^rais #;
+V:^ran #;

+V:^se #;
+V:^ses #;
+V:^semos #;
+V:^seis #;
+V:^sen #;

+V:^ía #;
+V:^ías #;
+V:^íamos #;
+V:^íais #;
+V:^ían #;

LEXICON Ainf

+A:0 #;
+A:^s #;
+A:^a #;
+A:^as #;
+A:^ísimo #;
+A:^ísima #;

LEXICON Noun
absolutismo Ninf;
acetilisoeugenol Ninf;
actinometría Ninf;
adrizamiento Ninf;
agarosa Ninf;
airosidad Ninf;
alcanfor Ninf;
alguacilesa Ninf;
alpargatero Ninf;
americano Ninf;
áncora Ninf;
anonadamiento Ninf;
antracología Ninf;
apoferritina Ninf;
archivo Ninf;
arrendador Ninf;
asilo Ninf;
atopia Ninf;
automorfismo Ninf;
azogue Ninf;
balde Ninf;
barco Ninf;
batimiento Ninf;
besana Ninf;
biombo Ninf;
blenoftalmía Ninf;
bonete Ninf;
bragadura Ninf;
bruteza Ninf;
buz Ninf;
cafetera Ninf;
calificador Ninf;
canaco Ninf;
cañizar Ninf;
carbón Ninf;
carpintería Ninf;
castañetada Ninf;
cávea Ninf;
cenicilla Ninf;
certeza Ninf;
chapa Ninf;
chincharrero Ninf;
ciaboga Ninf;
cimetidina Ninf;
ciudadanía Ninf;
cloroquina Ninf;
cofrecillo Ninf;
colombianismo Ninf;
complejidad Ninf;
conductismo Ninf;
conservadurismo Ninf;
contramedida Ninf;
coque Ninf;
corredura Ninf;
cotoncillo Ninf;
crisol Ninf;
cuajadillo Ninf;
culero Ninf;
dactilología Ninf;
dedal Ninf;
dentudo Ninf;
desatentado Ninf;
desecho Ninf;
desilusión Ninf;
desperdigamiento Ninf;
deuteranomalía Ninf;
diecisieteavo Ninf;
diplonte Ninf;
distracción Ninf;
doscientosavo Ninf;
economizador Ninf;
electrolización Ninf;
embustero Ninf;
encamado Ninf;
endotelio Ninf;
enrudecimiento Ninf;
enviado Ninf;
erigmofonía Ninf;
escíncido Ninf;
esfenoiditis Ninf;
espermatorrea Ninf;
estafermo Ninf;
estolidez Ninf;
etilómetro Ninf;
excreción Ninf;
extravagancia Ninf;
faquí Ninf;
fenilmorfolina Ninf;
filiera Ninf;
flegmasía Ninf;
forcípula Ninf;
frailía Ninf;
fular Ninf;
galgo Ninf;
garra Ninf;
gentileza Ninf;
glacioeustatismo Ninf;
golpista Ninf;
granujería Ninf;
guapo Ninf;
günz Ninf;
hayo Ninf;
henrio Ninf;
hibridación Ninf;
hilillo Ninf;
hiscal Ninf;
horchata Ninf;
iberismo Ninf;
impermeable Ninf;
inculcador Ninf;
infracosto Ninf;
insonorización Ninf;
intestino Ninf;
isalobara Ninf;
jáculo Ninf;
jubileo Ninf;
kilolitro Ninf;
laminero Ninf;
laúd Ninf;
lenidad Ninf;
licenciosidad Ninf;
lionés Ninf;
locero Ninf;
luteoskirina Ninf;
mafia Ninf;
malo Ninf;
marjor Ninf;
meiosis Ninf;
metilantraquinona Ninf;
mina Ninf;
monada Ninf;
motocarro Ninf;
naturismo Ninf;
niveladora Ninf;
octeto Ninf;
organicismo Ninf;
paja Ninf;
papista Ninf;
patavino Ninf;
pencazo Ninf;
pervibrador Ninf;
pirolusita Ninf;
pocillo Ninf;
portaimán Ninf;
preordinación Ninf;
prosista Ninf;
pusilánime Ninf;
radiodifusión Ninf;
rebozado Ninf;
regatón Ninf;
reprogramación Ninf;
rezado Ninf;
rotoarado Ninf;
salvia Ninf;
semema Ninf;
sialocele Ninf;
sobredepreciación Ninf;
sostenido Ninf;
suní Ninf;
tángana Ninf;
temerón Ninf;
tex Ninf;
tope Ninf;
trapo Ninf;
tripudo Ninf;
unidad Ninf;
veguero Ninf;
vienés Ninf;
wolastonita Ninf;
zoo Ninf;
LEXICON Verb
abar Vinf;
abrir Vinf;
aburrir Vinf;
accidentar Vinf;
acobardar Vinf;
aconchabar Vinf;
acriminar Vinf;
adir Vinf;
afeitar Vinf;
agitar Vinf;
agusanar Vinf;
ajusticiar Vinf;
alegorizar Vinf;
alistar Vinf;
amadrinar Vinf;
amasar Vinf;
amortajar Vinf;
angostar Vinf;
apabullar Vinf;
apelotonar Vinf;
aporrear Vinf;
apuñar Vinf;
arponar Vinf;
arrollar Vinf;
asir Vinf;
asorochar Vinf;
astreñir Vinf;
atarrajar Vinf;
atiesar Vinf;
atorar Vinf;
aviciar Vinf;
bagar Vinf;
barajar Vinf;
barzonear Vinf;
besuquear Vinf;
blandear Vinf;
borrar Vinf;
bugir Vinf;
cadmiar Vinf;
campar Vinf;
caramelear Vinf;
catastrar Vinf;
centellar Vinf;
cerner Vinf;
chapalear Vinf;
chisporrotear Vinf;
cincar Vinf;
cobijar Vinf;
colaborar Vinf;
colorar Vinf;
comisquear Vinf;
competir Vinf;
conducir Vinf;
consentir Vinf;
contener Vinf;
contristar Vinf;
convergir Vinf;
corcovear Vinf;
costreñir Vinf;
cuadrar Vinf;
cucar Vinf;
decuplicar Vinf;
dentellear Vinf;
desacobardar Vinf;
desalabar Vinf;
desapasionar Vinf;
desatascar Vinf;
descabalar Vinf;
descascarar Vinf;
descolorar Vinf;
descuartizar Vinf;
desemejar Vinf;
desenfardar Vinf;
desecar Vinf;
desgranzar Vinf;
desigualar Vinf;
deslucir Vinf;
desnervar Vinf;
despear Vinf;
despistar Vinf;
desquijarar Vinf;
destentar Vinf;
desvirar Vinf;
diamantar Vinf;
decir Vinf;
distender Vinf;
dorar Vinf;
elementar Vinf;
embermejar Vinf;
embrazar Vinf;
emparrar Vinf;
empecer Vinf;
enalbardar Vinf;
encanillar Vinf;
encasillar Vinf;
encorajar Vinf;
enderezar Vinf;
engarrotar Vinf;
enhebrar Vinf;
enmarcar Vinf;
ensandecer Vinf;
entibar Vinf;
entrar Vinf;
entumecer Vinf;
equipar Vinf;
escapar Vinf;
escribir Vinf;
esperar Vinf;
estañar Vinf;
etimologizar Vinf;
experimentar Vinf;
fallar Vinf;
filetear Vinf;
formar Vinf;
frivolizar Vinf;
galopear Vinf;
germinar Vinf;
gratinar Vinf;
halagar Vinf;
hendir Vinf;
hender Vinf;
hombrear Vinf;
igualar Vinf;
impurificar Vinf;
infectar Vinf;
insolentar Vinf;
introducir Vinf;
jalar Vinf;
lagrimar Vinf;
legrar Vinf;
llagar Vinf;
machihembrar Vinf;
maltraer Vinf;
manquear Vinf;
matizar Vinf;
mentar Vinf;
miar Vinf;
molificar Vinf;
muchachear Vinf;
nevar Vinf;
ocupar Vinf;
ordenar Vinf;
pajarear Vinf;
parar Vinf;
perder Vinf;
piratear Vinf;
poseer Vinf;
prever Vinf;
pudrir Vinf;
quitar Vinf;
rebordear Vinf;
recuadrar Vinf;
refundir Vinf;
remedir Vinf;
replantar Vinf;
repodrir Vinf;
retar Vinf;
retrillar Vinf;
rociar Vinf;
saltar Vinf;
simpatizar Vinf;
solar Vinf;
subvenir Vinf;
tachonar Vinf;
tener Vinf;
transponer Vinf;
triscar Vinf;
valer Vinf;
viaticar Vinf;
zarpar Vinf;
LEXICON Adj
absorbente Ainf;
acelular Ainf;
acomodable Ainf;
acucharado Ainf;
adjunto Ainf;
aerógeno Ainf;
aglicosúrico Ainf;
ahíto Ainf;
alcanosulfónico Ainf;
alítico Ainf;
alucinante Ainf;
ametrópico Ainf;
anafrodisiaco Ainf;
anexo Ainf;
anisopétalo Ainf;
anticiclónico Ainf;
antiliberal Ainf;
antisocial Ainf;
apaciguador Ainf;
apodo Ainf;
aranés Ainf;
armamentista Ainf;
artesanal Ainf;
asincrónico Ainf;
auditivo Ainf;
avaro Ainf;
barbilucio Ainf;
beneficiador Ainf;
bimestral Ainf;
bolchevique Ainf;
bromhídrico Ainf;
caduco Ainf;
campaniforme Ainf;
carbónico Ainf;
casto Ainf;
cegajo Ainf;
cerebral Ainf;
chino-japonés Ainf;
cinematográfico Ainf;
clórico Ainf;
collón Ainf;
comunero Ainf;
conformista Ainf;
contemplador Ainf;
coracobraquial Ainf;
cosaco Ainf;
criselefantino Ainf;
cuatralbo Ainf;
damascado Ainf;
dehidroacético Ainf;
departamental Ainf;
descumbrado Ainf;
despampanante Ainf;
dialisépalo Ainf;
dimensional Ainf;
disléxico Ainf;
dolménico Ainf;
economista Ainf;
electromóvil Ainf;
empecatado Ainf;
éneo Ainf;
envenenador Ainf;
errabundo Ainf;
esferulítico Ainf;
estánnico Ainf;
estruendoso Ainf;
excepcional Ainf;
expurgatorio Ainf;
falciforme Ainf;
femoral Ainf;
filtrable Ainf;
flotante Ainf;
foveolar Ainf;
fúlgido Ainf;
gallero Ainf;
genitivo Ainf;
glicólico Ainf;
grato Ainf;
habanero Ainf;
hepatorrenal Ainf;
hidrocéfalo Ainf;
hipodérmico Ainf;
homógrado Ainf;
ibicenco Ainf;
imitativo Ainf;
inactivo Ainf;
incongelable Ainf;
indigestible Ainf;
infeccioso Ainf;
injusto Ainf;
insepulto Ainf;
interceptador Ainf;
intersexual Ainf;
invertebrado Ainf;
isobárico Ainf;
jabonero Ainf;
keynesiano Ainf;
largueado Ainf;
leonés Ainf;
límnico Ainf;
lobuno Ainf;
machista Ainf;
maldiciente Ainf;
mantecoso Ainf;
maternal Ainf;
melancólico Ainf;
mesmo Ainf;
microprogramable Ainf;
mistificador Ainf;
monoclinal Ainf;
mordaz Ainf;
multiforme Ainf;
naftílico Ainf;
nemoral Ainf;
níveo Ainf;
nucleófilo Ainf;
84 Ainf;
oligopólico Ainf;
orejisano Ainf;
ovoso Ainf;
pampeano Ainf;
parafrástico Ainf;
párvulo Ainf;
pedial Ainf;
pentélico Ainf;
pernítrico Ainf;
pigmentario Ainf;
plano Ainf;
polarímetrico Ainf;
pomeranio Ainf;
postremo Ainf;
premaxilar Ainf;
primigenio Ainf;
promocional Ainf;
psicoanalítico Ainf;
pusinesco Ainf;
rabisalsera Ainf;
realengo Ainf;
reduccionista Ainf;
remedador Ainf;
requiriente Ainf;
retromandibular Ainf;
rocoso Ainf;
rugiente Ainf;
salino Ainf;
sardesco Ainf;
selector Ainf;
sensacionalista Ainf;
74 Ainf;
simón Ainf;
sobrecogedor Ainf;
sordomudo Ainf;
substancioso Ainf;
superador Ainf;
suspensor Ainf;
tártrico Ainf;
tentativo Ainf;
testarrón Ainf;
tlaxcalteca Ainf;
tragante Ainf;
trasanejo Ainf;
tributable Ainf;
triunviral Ainf;
ulcerógeno Ainf;
uranio Ainf;
vaporoso Ainf;
venturo Ainf;
27 Ainf;
vocacional Ainf;
yuguloomohioideo Ainf;
